Maryland, session 2026, HB0742.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
9.5–114.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Child care licensing region” means any one of 13 regions designated by
the Department to provide licensing and oversight for family child care programs.
(3) “Family child care” means the care given to a child under the age of 13
years or to a developmentally disabled person under the age of 21 years that is in place of
parental care for less than 24 hours a day, in a residence other than the child’s residence,
for which the family child care provider is paid.
(4) “Family child care provider” means an individual who cares for children
in a registered family child care home or a registered large family child care home.
(5) “Local program” means a local jurisdiction or child care licensing region
that participates in the Program.
– 1 –

Ch. 699 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) “Program” means the Growing Family Child Care Opportunities
Program.
(7) “Start–up assistance” means the funding for starting a family child care
program including the cost of materials, curriculum, and renovations.
(b) (1) There is a Growing Family Child Care Opportunities Program in the
Department.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to provide grants to establish and
support local programs in the State.
(3) The Department shall partner with the Maryland Child Care Resource
Network to administer the Program.
(c) (1) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, on or before
September 1, 2022, the Department shall award at least three grants, each of which does
not exceed $150,000, in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection to establish and
support family child care providers in the State.
(2) (i) To be eligible for a grant under this section, a county governing
body or multiple county governing bodies shall sign a memorandum of understanding with
a child care resource center that serves the child care licensing region that contains one of
the counties.
(ii) The county or counties and the child care resource center jointly
shall apply for the grant and administer the local program.
(e) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, for each of fiscal years 2023,
2024, [and] 2026, AND 2028 THROUGH 2030, the Governor shall include in the annual
budget bill an appropriation of $450,000 to the Program.
(2) To the extent authorized under federal law, the Governor shall use
federal funds to satisfy the requirement of paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(g) (1) The Department may seek funding to start the Program.
(2) If the Department receives funding before July 1, 2022, the Department
shall begin awarding grants as soon as possible under the Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –